Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.843

Exceptional faculty awards—Determination of award—Collective bargaining.

The process for determining local awards shall be subject to collective bargaining. Decisions regarding the amounts of individual awards and who receives them shall not be subject to collective bargaining and shall be subject to approval of the applicable board of trustees.

[ 1991 c 238 s 66; 1990 c 29 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1990 c 29: See note following RCW 28B.50.835.